nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy > Tettingsverktøy: Fugefjernere; Fugeglattere; Fugepistoler
en: Hardware > Tools > Caulking Tools: Caulk Removers; Caulk Smoothers; Caulking Guns
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge > Stemmwerkzeuge: Dichtmittelentferner; Dichtmittelglätter; Dichtmittelpistolen
pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia > Narzędzia do uszczelniania: Środki do usuwania uszczelnień; Środki do wygładzania uszczelnień; Pistolety do uszczelniania
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje > Tužlíky: Škrabky pro odstranění silikonového lepidla a tmelu; Špachtle na silikon/tmel; Vytlačovací pistole
ja: DIY用品 > 工具 > コーキング用具: コーキングリムーバー; コーキングスムーザー; コーキングガン
pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas > Ferramentas para calafetagem: Removedores de calafetagem; Alisadores de calafetagem; Pistolas de calafetagem
da: Isenkram > Redskaber > Stemmeværktøjer: Træfjernere; Træudglattere; Træpistoler
sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje > Nástroje na tmelenie: Odstraňovače tmelu; Stierky na tmelenie; Pištole na tmelenie
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils > Outils de calfat: Dissolvants de calfeutrage; Lisseurs de calfeutrage; Pistolets de calfeutrage
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler > Kalafat Aletleri: Kalafat Sökücüler; Kalafat Pürüzsüzleştiriciler; Kalafat Tabancaları
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具 > 填隙工具: 填縫劑清除劑; 填縫平滑工具; 填縫槍
pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas > Ferramentas de calafetagem: Removedores de calafetagem; Suavizadores de calafetagem; Pistolas de calafetagem
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg > Drevningsverktyg: Fogmasseborttagare; Fogmasseutjämnare; Fogmassepistol
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap > Breeuwgereedschappen: Breeuwverwijderaars; Breeuwafstrijkers; Breeuwpistolen
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία > Εργαλεία καλαφατίσματος: Αφαιρούμενα καλαφατιστικά; Εργαλεία εξομάλυνσης καλαφατιστικών; Πιστόλια καλαφατίσματος
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut > Saumaustyökalut: Saumanpoistotyökalut; Saumantasoittimet; Saumauspistoolit
bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти > Инструменти за уплътняване: Средства за отстраняване на уплътнения; Средства за заглаждане на уплътнения; Пистолети за уплътняване
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte > Scule de călăfătuire: Scule pentru îndepărtarea călăfătuirii; Scule pentru netezirea calafatului; Pistoale pentru călăfătuire
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili > Attrezzi da calafato: Prodotti per la rimozione del mastice; Prodotti per la lisciatura del mastice; Pistole per mastice
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas > Herramientas para calafatear: Eliminadores de masilla; Suavizadores de calafateo; Pistolas para calafatear
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok > Tömítőszerszámok: Tömítéseltávolítók; Tömítéssimítók; Tömítőfegyverek
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具 > 填缝工具: 填缝剂; 填缝平滑剂; 填缝枪
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ > เครื่องมืออุดรอยรั่ว: น้ำยาล้างคราบกาวอุดรอยรั่ว; น้ำยาปรับหน้ากาวอุดรอยรั่ว; ปืนยิงกาวอุดรอยรั่ว
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai > Sandarinimo įrankiai: Sandariklio valikliai; Sandariklio lyginimo įrankiai; Sandariklio pistoletai
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati > Alati za brtvljenje: Sredstva za uklanjanje brtvila; Zaglađivači brtvila; Pištolji za brtvljenje
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ > Dụng cụ trét: Chất tẩy keo trét; Chất làm mịn keo trét; Súng hàn
ko: 철물 > 도구 > 코킹 도구: 코킹 제거제; 코킹 유연제; 코킹건
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja > Orodje za tesnjenje: Orodja za odstranjevanje tesnilnih mas; Orodje za glajenje tesnilnih mas; Pištole za tesnilne mase
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты > Инструменты для работы с герметиком: Скребки для удаления герметика; Скребки для нанесения герметика; Пистолеты для герметика